src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv23_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: trúgv
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: trúgv
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: trúgv
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: trúar
    trúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: trúgvir
    trúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: trúgvum
    trúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: trúgva
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: trúgvin
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: trúnna
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: trúnni
    trúgv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: trúarinnar
    trúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: trúgvirnar
    trúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: trúgvunum
    trúgv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: trúgvanna
